Hawaii, session 2025, GM1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 350-1.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The initial oral report shall be followed as soon as
possible by a report in writing to the department; provided
that:
(1) If a police department or the department of law
enforcement is the initiating agency, a written report
shall be filed with the department for cases that the
police or the department of law enforcement takes
further action on or for active cases in the
department under this chapter;
(2) All written reports shall contain the name and address
of the child and the child's parents or other persons
responsible for the child's care, if known[—]
military status of the child's parents or other
persons responsible for the child's care, if known;
the child's age[—]£ the nature and extent of the
2025-2825 SB951 CDl SMA.docx
■nHiiiiiniiiiBiiiniiiM

Page 2 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
child's injuries [—] 2. and any other information that
the reporter believes might be helpful or relevant to
the investigation of the child abuse or neglect; and
(3) This subsection shall not be construed to serve as a
cause of action against the department, the police, or
the department of law enforcement."
SECTION 2. Section 350-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§350-2 Action on reporting. (a) Upon receiving a report
concerning child abuse or neglect, the department shall proceed
pursuant to chapter 587A and the department's rules.
(b) The department shall inform the appropriate police
department of all reports received by the department regarding a
case of child abuse or neglect, including reports received under
section 350-1.1; provided that the name of the person who
reported the case of child abuse or neglect shall be released to
the police department pursuant only to court order or the
person's consent.
(c) Upon receiving a report, if there is sufficient
information to determine that the report involves a family where
one of tlie par;ent^j 2uaxdieJ2^j or aJJ^e2ed per£etr;abors is a
2025-2825 SB951 CDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3
S B. NO. a,
C.D. 1
member of an identifiable branch of the United States military,
the department shall inform the appropriate authority for that
branch of the military.
[4e4-] (d) The department shall infoism the appropriate
police department or office of the prosecuting attorney of the
relevant information concerning a case of child abuse or neglect
when the information is required by the police department or the
office of the prosecuting attorney for the investigation or
prosecution of that case; provided that the name of the person
who reported the case of child abuse or neglect shall be
released to the police department or the office of the
prosecuting attorney pursuant only to court order or the
person's consent.
[-fdj-] (e) The department shall maintain a central registry
of reported child abuse or neglect cases in accordance with
section 350-2.5.
[-4e^] (f) For a confirmed case of child abuse or neglect
that occurred at a licensed or registered child care facility as
defined in section 346-151, the department [-i-g-authorizcd to]
may disclose that the report of child abuse or neglect was
confirmed to any parent or guardian of a child who was enrolled
2025-2825 SB951 GDI SMA.docx

Page 4 S.B. NO. --
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
at the licensed or registered child care facility as defined in
section 346-151.
[-€^4-] (g) For a confirmed case of child abuse or neglect
that occurred at a child care facility as defined in
section 346-151 that is operating in accordance with an
exclusion or exemption pursuant to section 346-152 and upon
receipt of consent, the department [is aut-he-rized to] m^
disclose the report of child abuse or neglect was confirmed to
any parent or guardian of a child who was enrolled at the child
care facility.
t-tsH-] (h) For a confirmed case of child abuse or neglect
that results in a child's death or near fatality, the department
[is-authorized to] may disclose to the public:
(1) The cause of and circumstances regarding the fatality
or near fatality;
(2) The age and gender of-the child;
(3) Information describing any previous reports and
results of child abuse or neglect investigations that
are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led
to the fatality or near fatality; and
2025-2825 SB951 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(4) The action taken by the department on behalf of the
child that is pertinent to the child abuse or neglect
that led to the fatality or near fatality.
[-(414-] (i) The department shall adopt rules as may be
necessary in carrying out this section."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that section 2 shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2825 SB951 CDl SMA.docx 5

S.B. NO.
"2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 1st day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAIM

S.B. No. 951, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 951, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives